Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.235

Producer-handlers as producers for membership purposes—Exception.

Whenever any commodity board is formed under the provisions of this chapter and it only affects producers and producer-handlers, then such producer-handlers shall be considered to be acting only as producers for purpose of membership on a commodity board: PROVIDED, That this section shall not apply to a commodity board which only affects producers and producer-handlers of essential oils.

[ 2002 c 313 s 22; 1971 c 25 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.